test/src/gt-desc-yamls/Pron-miae_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - miä: # Noun (37) miä 'eng what /est /fin' - full paradigm
     miä+Pron+Interr+SP+Nom: miä
     miä+Pron+Interr+SP+Gen: mink
     miä+Pron+Interr+SP+Par: midä
     miä+Pron+Interr+SP+Ill: [minkahe, miihe]
     miä+Pron+Interr+SP+Ine: [minkan, minkah, minkahn, miin, miih, miihn]
     miä+Pron+Interr+SP+Ela: [minkast, miist]
     miä+Pron+Interr+SP+All: [minkalõ, miile]
     miä+Pron+Interr+SP+Ade: [minkal, miil]
     miä+Pron+Interr+SP+Abl: [minkalt, miilt]
     miä+Pron+Interr+SP+Tra: [minkas, miis]
     miä+Pron+Interr+SP+Ter: [minkaniq, meeniq]
     miä+Pron+Interr+SP+Abe: [minkaldaq, miildäq]
     miä+Pron+Interr+SP+Com: minkaq
